lexc/verb/enhuige7.lexc
LEXICON Casemely
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeomely§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelolmely§         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeumely§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igeamely§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeomely§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeomely§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1mely§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeumely§k       #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1mely§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1mely§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igeamely§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaamely§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeomely§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeumely§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igeamely§t§igeomely§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igeamely§n§igeamely§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeamely§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igeamely§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igeamely§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeumely§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaamely§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AAmely§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaamely§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattetmely§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeumely§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igeamely§t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igeamely§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igeamely§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igeamely§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igeamely§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeumely§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaamely§t§igeo2mely§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaamely§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg1^n§igeaamely§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg1^n§igeamely§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaamely§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoomely§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaamely§n§igeamely§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaamely§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaamely§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaamely§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaamely§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaamely§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igeamely§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igeamely§l§igeamely§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igeamely§l§igeamely§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaamely§l§igeamely§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON Case1mely
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeomely§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelolmely§         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeumely§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igeamely§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeomely§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeomely§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1mely§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeumely§k       #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1mely§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1mely§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igeamely§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaamely§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeomely§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeumely§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igeamely§t§igeomely§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igeamely§n§igeamely§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeamely§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igeamely§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igeamely§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeumely§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaamely§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AAmely§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaamely§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattetmely§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeumely§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igeamely§t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igeamely§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igeamely§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igeamely§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igeamely§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeumely§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaamely§t§igeo2mely§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaamely§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg1^n§igeaamely§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg1^n§igeamely§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaamely§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoomely§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaamely§n§igeamely§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaamely§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaamely§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaamely§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaamely§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaamely§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igeamely§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igeamely§l§igeamely§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igeamely§l§igeamely§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaamely§l§igeamely§k                  #;    ! ná/né


LEXICON AddVerbtett
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Reptett;

LEXICON Reptett
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^t      #;    ! t
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo§g§AA§t  Impertet;
                    Imper1tet;


LEXICON AddVerbtet
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Reptet;

LEXICON Reptet
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo§g§AA§t  Impertet;
                    Imper1tet;

LEXICON Verb
barcog AddVerbtet;
battyog AddVerbtet;
berreg AddVerbtet;
biceg AddVerbtet;
biggyed AddVerbtett;
brekeg AddVerbtet;
brummog AddVerbtet;
bugyog AddVerbtet;
bájcseveg AddVerbtet;
cammog AddVerbtet;
cincog AddVerbtet;
csacsog AddVerbtet;
csapkod AddVerbtet;
csattog AddVerbtet;
csemcseg AddVerbtet;
csepeg AddVerbtet;
cserreg AddVerbtet;
csetteg AddVerbtet;
cseveg AddVerbtet;
csicsog AddVerbtet;
csillog AddVerbtet;
csipked AddVerbtet;
csipog AddVerbtet;
csirreg AddVerbtet;
csiszeg AddVerbtet;
csivog AddVerbtet;
csobog AddVerbtet;
csoszog AddVerbtet;
csácsog AddVerbtet;
csámcsog AddVerbtet;
csíp AddVerbtet;
csügged AddVerbtett;
cuppog AddVerbtet;
dadog AddVerbtet;
dermed AddVerbtett;
dirmeg AddVerbtet;
dobog AddVerbtet;
dohog AddVerbtet;
dunnyog AddVerbtet;
durrog AddVerbtet;
duzzog AddVerbtet;
dülled AddVerbtett;
enged AddVerbtet;
eped AddVerbtet;
ered AddVerbtett;
erjed AddVerbtett;
ernyed AddVerbtett;
farag AddVerbtet;
fecseg AddVerbtet;
feled AddVerbtet;
fittyed AddVerbtett;
fityeg AddVerbtet;
fogad AddVerbtet;
fortyog AddVerbtet;
förmed AddVerbtett;
fülled AddVerbtett;
gagyog AddVerbtet;
gebed AddVerbtett;
gennyed AddVerbtett;
gerjed AddVerbtett;
gágog AddVerbtet;
görbed AddVerbtett;
görnyed AddVerbtett;
habog AddVerbtet;
harap AddVerbtet;
harsog AddVerbtet;
hebeg AddVerbtet;
heged AddVerbtett;
hemzseg AddVerbtet;
henceg AddVerbtet;
herreg AddVerbtet;
herseg AddVerbtet;
hetyeg AddVerbtet;
hortyog AddVerbtet;
huhog AddVerbtet;
hurrog AddVerbtet;
hápog AddVerbtet;
húzkod AddVerbtet;
ihog AddVerbtet;
ijed AddVerbtett;
imád AddVerbtet;
ireg AddVerbtet;
ityeg AddVerbtet;
ityeg-fityeg AddVerbtet;
kacag AddVerbtet;
kaffog AddVerbtet;
kapkod AddVerbtet;
kattog AddVerbtet;
kerreg AddVerbtet;
ketyeg AddVerbtet;
kocog AddVerbtet;
kopog AddVerbtet;
kotyog AddVerbtet;
krákog AddVerbtet;
kullog AddVerbtet;
kuncog AddVerbtet;
kurrog AddVerbtet;
károg AddVerbtet;
képed AddVerbtett;
laffog AddVerbtet;
lebeg AddVerbtet;
leffeg AddVerbtet;
leppeg AddVerbtet;
letyeg AddVerbtet;
libeg AddVerbtet;
libeg-lobog AddVerbtet;
lifeg AddVerbtet;
liheg AddVerbtet;
lobog AddVerbtet;
locsog AddVerbtet;
lopkod AddVerbtet;
lotyog AddVerbtet;
lépked AddVerbtet;
löttyed AddVerbtett;
makog AddVerbtet;
mekeg AddVerbtet;
mered AddVerbtett;
mormog AddVerbtet;
motyog AddVerbtet;
mélyed AddVerbtett;
nyafog AddVerbtet;
nyammog AddVerbtet;
nyekeg AddVerbtet;
nyervog AddVerbtet;
nyifog AddVerbtet;
nyihog AddVerbtet;
nyiszog AddVerbtet;
nyomkod AddVerbtet;
nyámmog AddVerbtet;
nyávog AddVerbtet;
okád AddVerbtet;
pampog AddVerbtet;
pattog AddVerbtet;
perceg AddVerbtet;
petyeg AddVerbtet;
picsog AddVerbtet;
piheg AddVerbtet;
pilled AddVerbtett;
pillog AddVerbtet;
pislog AddVerbtet;
pisszeg AddVerbtet;
piszmog AddVerbtet;
pittyed AddVerbtett;
pittyeg AddVerbtet;
pityeg AddVerbtet;
plattyog AddVerbtet;
potyog AddVerbtet;
pufog AddVerbtet;
pusmog AddVerbtet;
pöffed AddVerbtett;
püffed AddVerbtett;
ragyog AddVerbtet;
rebeg AddVerbtet;
recseg AddVerbtet;
recseg-ropog AddVerbtet;
reked AddVerbtett;
remeg AddVerbtet;
reped AddVerbtett;
repked AddVerbtet;
retteg AddVerbtet;
rivalg AddVerbtet;
robog AddVerbtet;
ropog AddVerbtet;
roszog AddVerbtet;
rotyog AddVerbtet;
réved AddVerbtett;
selypeg AddVerbtet;
senyved AddVerbtet;
seppeg AddVerbtet;
serceg AddVerbtet;
serked AddVerbtet;
sipog AddVerbtet;
slattyog AddVerbtet;
suhog AddVerbtet;
sunnyog AddVerbtet;
surrog AddVerbtet;
susmog AddVerbtet;
susog AddVerbtet;
suttog AddVerbtet;
szenved AddVerbtet;
szepeg AddVerbtet;
szipog AddVerbtet;
sziszeg AddVerbtet;
szortyog AddVerbtet;
szuszog AddVerbtet;
széled AddVerbtet;
szörnyed AddVerbtett;
sápog AddVerbtet;
süllyed AddVerbtett;
süpped AddVerbtett;
tapod AddVerbtet;
terjed AddVerbtett;
tesped AddVerbtett;
tipeg AddVerbtet;
tocsog AddVerbtet;
topog AddVerbtet;
totyog AddVerbtet;
tépked AddVerbtet;
téved AddVerbtett;
töpped AddVerbtett;
vacog AddVerbtet;
vartyog AddVerbtet;
vihog AddVerbtet;
villog AddVerbtet;
zizeg AddVerbtet;
zsibog AddVerbtet;
zuhog AddVerbtet;
ébred AddVerbtett;
éled AddVerbtett;
LEXICON Verb1
benneragyog AddVerbtet;
bennreked AddVerbtett;
bentreked AddVerbtett;
együttdobog AddVerbtet;
ittreked AddVerbtett;
kinnreked AddVerbtett;
kintreked AddVerbtett;
közécsíp AddVerbtet; !ige7
odébbpattog AddVerbtet;
